Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.590

Liability of foster parents.

In actions for personal injury or property damage commenced by foster children or their parents against foster parents licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW, the liability of foster parents for the care and supervision of foster children shall be the same as the liability of biological and adoptive parents for the care and supervision of their children.

[ 1991 c 283 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—1991 c 283: See notes following RCW 74.14B.080.